Utah statutes.
63H-1-204.   MIDA energy tax.

(1)  By ordinance, an authority board may levy a MIDA energy tax, within a project area, on an energy supplier as defined in Section 10-1-303.

(2)  The maximum rate of the MIDA energy tax is 6% of the delivered value as defined in Section 10-1-303, except that delivered value does not include the amount of a tax paid under this section.

(3) (a)  An energy supplier may recover an amount equal to the MIDA energy tax from its customers, if the energy supplier includes the amount as a separate billing line item.

(b)  The MIDA energy tax levied under this section is in addition to the rate approved by the Public Service Commission and charged to the customer.

(4)  If the authority has levied a municipal energy tax in the project area, the MIDA energy tax paid by a customer is reduced by any municipal energy tax paid by that customer on the same delivered value.

(5) (a)  The MIDA energy tax is payable by the energy supplier to MIDA on a monthly basis as described by the ordinance levying the tax.

(b)  The ordinance shall allow the energy supplier to retain 1% of the tax remittance each month to offset the energy supplier's costs of collecting and remitting the tax.



Enacted by Chapter 362, 2013 General Session

